src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"%{АОØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{АОØ%}:0 <=>
          Cns: _ %^RmVow: ;
!! офта+N+Sg+Nom+Def **bear/ohto, karhu**
!!€ офт%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>сь
!!€ офт00%>сь
!! кодама+A+Pl+Nom+Indef:
!!€ кодам{АОØ}^RmVow>{Х}т{ЬØ}
!!€ кодап00>0т0
!! тяфтама+A+Pl+Nom+Indef: **this kind of/tällainen**
!!$ тяфтам{АОØ}>{Х}т{ЬØ}
!!$ тяфтапо>0т0


![Vows|%{АО%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕО%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:]  %> _ Cns ;
!        [з|й|л|н|р] (ь:) %> _  [к с | с [#| %-|%>]] ;

"%{АО%}:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{АО%}:о <=>
        Cns _ %> [%{ЕОØ%}:|%{DIM%}:|%{Х%}: т|Cns] ;
!! пула+N+Sg+Nom+Def: **tail**
!!€ пул%{АО%}%>сь
!!€ пуло%>сь
!!€ пул%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}
!!€ пуло%>0нза
!!€ пул%{АО%}%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пуло%>0т0


"%{АО%}:а"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{АО%}:а <=>
   Cns  _ [ # | %-] ;
!!€ пул%{АО%}#
!!€ пула#

"Vx:0 %{ЕО%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
Vx:0 <=>
        Cns _ %> %{АЯ%}:  ;
	where Vx in (%{ЕО%}) ;

"{АО}:0 before Lat"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{АО%}:0 <=> Cns _ %> [%{АЯ%}: | %{ВИУ%}: ];
!! калма+N+SP+Lat+Indef: 
!!€ калм{АО}>{ВИУ}
!!€ калм0>у
!! пря+N+SP+Ine+Der/Cop+Prs+ScSg1 **top, head/pää**
!!€ пря%>с%{АО%}%>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ пря%>с0%>ан

"%{ЕО%}:е"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{ЕО%}:е <=>  _ [#| %- ] ;
!!€ сельм%{ЕО%}#
!!€ сельме#
      [ ш|ч] %> _ %> ш к а ;

"%{ЕО%}:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{ЕО%}:о <=>  [Cns - [ ш|ч|ж]]  _ %> [%{ЕОØ%}:| Cns:|:Cns|%{вгк%}:| %{Х%}:] ;
!!€ сельм%{ЕО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нь
!!€ сельмо%>0нь
       [с|ц] %> _ %> ш к а ;
  [Cns - [ ш|ч|ж]]  _ %^PXSG1: %> н е ;
!! сельме+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: __my eyes/silmäni
!!€ сельм%{ЕО%}%^PXSG1%>не
!!€ сельмо0%>не
      к %> _ %{DIM%}: я ;
!! байдек+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: **staff/sauva**
!!€ байдек%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я
!!€ байдек%>оня

"%{ЕØ%}:е"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{ЕØ%}:е  <=>  _ [%> |# | %- ] ; 

"%{ЕØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{ЕØ%}:0  <=>  _ %^RmVow: ;
!! тяште+N+Pl+Nom+Def **star/tähti**
!!€ тяшть%{ЕØ%}%^RmVow%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ тяшт000%>0ть


"0:j"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 0:й <=> %> [ %{ИЫЙ%}:ы | %{ИЫЙ%}:и ] %> _  х т [ :ь ]  ;
!CHECKME 2020-10-8

"е:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 е:0 <=>  _  %> %{ИЫЙ%}: [ # | %- | %> [в о к|%{гк%}: %{АЕ%}:] | (%>)  х т  :ь |н | х т е|т]  ;
          _  %> %{ИЫЙ%}: [ й: %> %{Х%}: | %> %{АЯ%}: | (й:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: | %> Cns ]  ;
         [ Cns | Vows ] _  [ %> %{АЯ%}:я| %> %{АЯ%}:а [ н | т ]| (%^Ь2ZERO:) %> %{ВИУ%}:] ; 
!! идемс+V+Der/NomAg+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1
!!€ иде>{ИЫЙ}й>{ЕОØ}ньк{ЕО}
!!€ ид0>и0>еньке
!! веле+N+SP+Lat+Indef
!!€ веле%>%{ВИУ%}
!!€ вел0%>и
!!!!!

"е:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 е:о <=> Cns: _ %^Е2О: %> (%{АО%}:|%{Х%}:) Cns: ;

! CHECKME
"е:а"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 е:а <=> Cns: _ %^Е2А: %> (%{АО%}:|%{Х%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:) Cns: ;

"е:я"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 е:я <=> Cns: _ %^Е2Я: ;


!! тувотня:тува+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Err/Orth-lowered-final-e-2-ja    !!≈ * @CODE@ final е lowered to я
!!€ тув%{АО%}%>%{Х%}тне%^Е2Я
!!€ туво%>0тня0

"%{АЕ%}:я"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{АЕ%}:я <=> :Cns _ %^Е2Я: ;


"%{ЕОØ%}:я"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ЕОØ%}:я <=> _ %^Е2Я: ;

"%{ЕО%}:я"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ЕО%}:я <=>  _ %^Е2Я: ;

"%{ЕØ%}:я"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ЕØ%}:я <=>  _ %^Е2Я: ;


"а:е"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 а:е <=> Cns: _ %^А2Е: %> ;

"а:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 а:о <=> Cns: _ %^А2О: %>  ;

"я:а"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 я:а <=>
 [CnsNonDent:|%{DIM%}:к] _ %^Я2А: %> [%{ЕОØ%}: [(н) ц| н т|н з|з %>| (н) к с] |%{вгк%}: %{АЕ%}:| %{Х%}: т %{ЬØ%}: [#|%-|%>]|ф т о м| д %{АО%}: |ш к а|с  [#|%-|%>]|с (т) %{АО%}: |%{ВИУ%}:|с н %{АО%}:] ;
 %{DIM%}:к _ %> [(н) ц| н з|з %>| (н) к с |ф т о м | д %{АО%}: |ш к а|с  [#|%-|%>]|с (т) %{АО%}: |с н %{АО%}: ] ;
! Cns: _ %^Я2А: %> ;
!!рьвя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: __wife/vaimo__
!!€ рьвя%^Я2А%>%{ЕОØ%}нц
!!€ рьва0%>0нц
!!€ ърьвя%^Я2А%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ърьва0%>0т0
!!€ ава%>з%>%{ЕОØ%}нт
!!€ ава0з0онт
!! вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: **window/ikkuna**
!!€ вальмя%^Я2А%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ вальма0%>0т0


"%{АЕØ%}:а Always"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕØ%}:а <= BTV [Cns - [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й |в|д | л | з]]+ %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
 ![Cns - [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й |в|д | л | з]] %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
 	      Cns [д | т | л | з]  %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
! 	      Cns [д | л | з]  %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              BTV [Cns - й]* [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;
!              BTV [б|в|г|ж|к|м|п|ф|х|ч|ш|щ]* [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;
!              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;

"%{АЕØ%}:а Sometimes"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕØ%}:а => BTV [Cns - [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й |в|д | л | з]]+ %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
! [Cns - [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й |в|д | л | з]] %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
              [д | т | л | з]  %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              BTV [Cns - й]* [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;
!              BTV [б|в|г|ж|к|м|п|ф|х|ч|ш|щ]* [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;
!              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;

"%{АЕØ%}:е Always"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕØ%}:е <= [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й: |[Cns - [ д | л | з]] ь:] %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
 	      Cns [д | л | з] ь: %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ %> (%{Х%}:) Cns | %> [%{ЕОØ%}:|%{DIM%}:] ]  ;
	       [ь:|й|FTV (н)] [б|г|ж|к|м|п|ф|х|ч|ш|щ]+ %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
"%{АЕØ%}:е Sometimes"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕØ%}:е => [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й: |[Cns - [ д | л | з]] ь:] %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [д | л | з] ь: %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ %> (%{Х%}:) Cns | %> [%{ЕОØ%}:|%{DIM%}:] ]  ;
	       [ь:|й|FTV (н)] [б|г|ж|к|м|п|ф|х|ч|ш|щ]+ %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
!! мокша+N+Sg+Nom+Def: **Moksha**
!!€ мокш%{АЕØ%}%>сь
!!€ мокше%>сь

"%{АЕØ%}:0 Always"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕØ%}:0 <=
    [ Vows | в ]  %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
    _ %> %{ВИУ%}: ;

"%{АЕØ%}:0 Sometimes"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕØ%}:0 =>
    [ Vows | в ]  %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
    _ %> %{ВИУ%}: ;
    Vows [ д | л | з] (ь:) %^CnsSt: %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;


"%{АЕ%}:a"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕ%}:а <=>
    ь  г  _  (%^Е2А:) %>  ;
   [ NPC | %{ЬØ%}:0| ъ |:Vows - [:FTV]] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:|г]  _  (%^Е2А:) %>  ;
!   [ :NPC | %{ЬØ%}:0| ъ |:Vows - [:FTV]] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:|г]  _  (%^Е2А:) %>  ;
!   [ [Vows - [и]] |# к и | NPC |ь| %{ЬØ%}:0| ъ |:Vows - [:и]] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:|г]  _  (%^Е2А:) %>  ;
   [ :NPC | %{ЬØ%}:0| ъ |:Vows - [:FTV]] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:| [:0]* н г]  _ [ # | %- ] ;
!   [ NPC | %{ЬØ%}:0| ъ |:Vows - [:FTV]] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:| [:0]* н г]  _ [ # | %- ] ;
!   [ [Vows - [и]] | NPC | %{ЬØ%}:0| ъ |:Vows - [:и]] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:| [:0]* н г]  _ [ # | %- ] ;
!! вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: **word/sana**
!!€ вал%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}#
!!€ вал%>га#
!! мельге+Pron+Prl+PxSg3: **after**
!!€ мельг%{АЕ%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}
!!€ мельга%>0нза
!!$ мельг%{АЕ%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}
!!$ мельге%>0нза
  [:Vows - [:и]] %^Я2А: %> %{вгк%}: _ [ # | %- | %> ] ;
!2024-06-15  [:Vows - [:и]] (%^Я2А:) %> %{вгк%}: _ [ # | %- | %> ] ;
!! вальмя+N+SP+Prl+Indef: **window/ikkuna**
!!€ вальмя%^Я2А%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вальма0%>ва

   ь ф к _ %>  ;
!перьфке
   [Cns - й ] %> г: _ [# | %- ] ;


"%{АЕ%}:е"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{АЕ%}:е <=> [ :ь| й] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:|г] _ [ # | %- ] ;
!! менель+N+SP+Prl+Indef **sky/taivas**
!!€ менель%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ менель%>ге
!!€ шяй%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ шяй%>ге
     :FTV %> [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:| (%{ЕОØ%}:0) н г|г] _ [ # | %- ] ;
!     и %> [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:|н г|г] _ [ # | %- ] ;
!! аля+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc **father/isä**
!!€ аля%>%{ЕОØ%}з%>ти%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ аля%>0з%>ти%>ге
   [ч|ш|ж|ч] _ %> ;
   ь ф к _ [# | %- ] ;
!перьфке
   [ Cns ь| й ] %> г: _ [# | %- ] ;


"%{АЯ%}:ya"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{АЯ%}:я <=>     [ CnsDent: [ (Vows) я:0 | е:0 | ь: ]|%{ИЫЙ%}:| й: | # Cns* [у|и]] %>  _  [ т | н ] ;
!!€ пань>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ пан00ян
!! тумс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1 **leave/lähteä**
!!€ ту>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ ту>ян
!! кундамс+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg2
!!€ кунда>{ИЫЙ}:0>{АЯ}:ят
!!€ кунда>{ИЫЙ}:0>{АЯ}:ят


   [ ь: | е | й: |:э | :е | :и | :ы | [э | е | и | ы] %^Devoice:0 %> ф] %> %{Х%}: т _ [ д | м | н ] ;
   [я | э | е | и | ы] [[л | р | с ] ь: [ г: | к ] ] %> %{Х%}: т _ [ д | м | н ] ;
!   [ CnsDentNoL ь: [ г: ] | ь: | е | й: ] %> %{Х%}: т _ [ д | м | н ] ;
!!€ пань>{Х}т{АЯ}ма
!!€ пан000тяма
!!€ кенерь>{Х}т{АЯ}ма
!!€ кенерь>хтяма
!! мярьгомс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: **say/sanoa**
!!€ мярьг%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}ма
!!€ мярьк%>0тяма
     \[Vows:]+ я [м:|ж:|в: ] %> %{Х%}: %{КТ%}: _ [ # | %- | к а] ;
   [ CnsDentNoL ь: [ г: ] | ь: | е | й | # \[Vows:|%>|#]* [и|е|э] [м:|ж:|в: ]] %> %{Х%}: %{КТ%}: _ [ # | %- | к а] ;
!!€ сим%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{АЯ%}
!!€ сип%>0тя
    \[Vows:| р |%>|#]+  я [м:|ж:|в: | %^Devoice:0 %> ф] %> %{Х%}: т _ [ д | м | н ] ;
   # \[Vows:|%>|#]* [и|е|э] [м:|ж:|в: | %^Devoice:0 %> ф] %> %{Х%}: т _ [ д | м | н ] ;
!! симомс+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: **say/sanoa**
!!€ сим%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}ма
!!€ сип%>0тяма


"%{АЯ%}:a"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{АЯ%}:а <=> [:BTV | [а | о | у | ё | ю] %^Devoice:0 %> ф| CnsDent: ] %>  %{Х%}: т  _  [ д | н | м ] ;
 [ а| о| у | ё| ю ] \[Vows:|%>]+ я %>  %{Х%}: т  _  [ д | н | м ] ;
 # (э р) я [Cns: - й:] %>  %{Х%}: т  _  [ д | н | м ] ;
 [ [ [ а| о| у | ё| ю ] ( %> ) NPC:+ (%^Devoice:0 %> ф)] | [ [BTV - я] л ь [[ NPC* NPC ] - [ :* к с ] ] ] ] %>  %{Х%}: т  _  [ д | н | м ] ;
![ :BTV | LBC | CnsDent: ] %>  %{Х%}: т  _  [ д | н | м ] ;

   [:BTV | CnsDent: | [ а| о| у | ё| ю ] \[Vows:|%>|#]+ я| [ [ [ а| о| у | ё| ю ] ( %> ) NPC:+ ] | [ BTV л ь [[ NPC* NPC ] - [ :* к с ] ] ] ] ] %> %{Х%}: %{КТ%}: _ [ # | %- | к а] ;
    [ ж | ч | ш ] ( а: | о: | %{АЕ%}: ) %>  _  [ т | н ] ;
    [[ CnsDent | CnsNonDent ] ( а: | о: )| %{ЕО%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:| %{АОØ%}:| %{АО%}: ] %>  _  [ т | н ] ;
!    [[ CnsDent | CnsNonDent ] ( а:0 | о:0 )| %{ЕО%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:| %{АОØ%}:| %{АО%}: ] %>  _  [ т | н ] ;
!!€ канд>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ канд0ан
  щ е: %> _ [ т | н ] ;
!!€ аще%>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ ащ0%>ан



"j:0 LEFT"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
й:0 <= [ :Vows| Vows %> %{ИЫЙ%}:] _ [ %> %{ВИУ%}: | %>  %{АЕØ%}:| %>  %{ЕОØ%}:е | %> %{ИЫЙ%}:и |   %> [%{АЯ%}:я | %{АО%}: [ :Cns | К3:0 | # | %- ]] ] ;
!!€ тий>{ЕОØ}за
!!€ ти0>еза
 [Vows CnsAndSoft+|к ш н]  [и|ы] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
 т и [й: %> %{ИЫЙ%}: |и] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
 # т и _ %> %{ЕОØ%}:  [ с ] ;
!! седи+N+Pl+Nom+Indef **heart/sydän**
!!€ седий%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ седи0%>хть

 [ е: |ь: | Cns ] %> %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{Х%}:  ;
 [Vows - [а|я]] %> %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{Х%}:  ;
! [ е: |ь: | CnsNonDent |Vows ] %> %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{Х%}:  ;
!! корхнемс+V+NomAg+Pl+Nom+Def: **visit, talk/jutella**
!!€ корхне%>%{ИЫЙ%}й%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ корхн0%>и0%>х0не
!! озондомс+V+NomAg+Pl+Nom+Def: **pray/rukoilla**
!!€ озонд%>%{ИЫЙ%}й%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ озонд%>ы0%>х0не
!!€ тонафт>{ИЫЙ}й>{ЕОØ}нь
!!€ тонафт>ы0>ень
!!$ тонафт>{ИЫЙ}й>{ЕОØ}нь
!!$ тонафт>ый>ень

"j:0 RIGHT"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
й:0 => [ :Vows| Vows %> %{ИЫЙ%}:] _ [ %> %{ВИУ%}: | %>  %{АЕØ%}:| %> %{ЕОØ%}:е | %> %{ИЫЙ%}:и|   %> [%{АЯ%}:я | %{АО%}: [ :Cns | К3:0 | # | %- ]] ] ;
!!€ тий>{ЕОØ}за
!!€ ти00еза
!С а р а н с к я й:0 > {ВИУ}:и

 [Vows CnsAndSoft+|к ш н| ш ]  [и|ы] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
 т и [й: %> %{ИЫЙ%}: |и] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
 # т и _ %> %{ЕОØ%}:  [ с ] ;
!! седи+N+Pl+Nom+Indef **heart/sydän**
!!€ седий%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ седи0%>хть

[ е: |ь: | Cns |Vows - [а|я]] %> %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{Х%}:  ;
! [ е: |ь: | CnsNonDent |Vows ] %> %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{Х%}:  ;
 %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: ;
!! араламс+V+Der/NomAg+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: **protect/puolustaa**
!!€ арала%>%{ИЫЙ%}й%>%{ЕОØ%}ц
!!€ арала%>00%>ец

!"й:х"
!! **@RULENAME@**
!й:х <=>
    _ %> %{Х%}: т %{АЯ%}: [ м|д] а ;
! CHECKME 2017-03-07


!
!18.04.2007 Adding "U2:" and contemplating environment "%> т н _"
!
"ye:e always"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{еэ%}:э <=
          CnsDent (%{АО%}:0) %>  н _ [[ # | %-|%> %{гк%}:0 а:я]| н ь: | к] ;
!          [[[Back - [:* Vows]] %>| CnsDent]  %> ] т: н _ [ # | %- |%> [%{гк%}:0 а:я |т| л|%{вгк%}:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


"ye:e sometimes"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{еэ%}:э =>
          [CnsDent|CnsNonDent] ( %{АО%}:0 ) %>  н _ [[ # | %-|%> %{гк%}:0 а:я]|н ь:|к ] ;
!          [ CnsDent | CnsNonDent | м:0 ]  ( %{АО%}:0 | %{АОØ%}:0 ) %> ( VLoss:0 ) ( TLoss:0 ) т: н _ [ # | %- | %> [%{гк%}:0 а:я | т | л | %{вгк%}:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


"a:ya"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
а:я  <=> :Vows ((%>) К3:0 )  %> %{гк%}:0 _  ;
